Louisiana, session 2026, HB719.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 16:51(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§51. Assistant district attorneys
A. The district attorney of each judicial district and of the parish of Orleans
shall appoint a first assistant district attorney and such other assistant district
attorneys for his respective judicial district or for the parish of Orleans as may be
necessary, the total number of assistant district attorneys in each judicial district and
in the parish of Orleans to be not less than the following:
(1) In the First Judicial District, thirty-five thirty-nine assistant district
attorneys;
(2) In the Second Judicial District, ten assistant district attorneys;
(3) In the Third Judicial District, nine ten assistant district attorneys;
(4) In the Fourth Judicial District, twenty-six twenty-seven assistant district
attorneys;
(5) In the Fifth Judicial District, seven eight assistant district attorneys;
(6) In the Sixth Judicial District, seven eight assistant district attorneys;
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 719 ENROLLED
(7) In the Seventh Judicial District, six seven assistant district attorneys;
(8) In the Eighth Judicial District, four five assistant district attorneys;
(9) In the Ninth Judicial District, fifteen sixteen assistant district attorneys;
(10) In the Tenth Judicial District, five six assistant district attorneys;
(11) In the Eleventh Judicial District, four five assistant district attorneys;
(12) In the Twelfth Judicial District, eight assistant district attorneys;
(13) In the Thirteenth Judicial District, five six assistant district attorneys;
(14) In the Fourteenth Judicial District, twenty-five twenty-seven assistant
district attorneys;
(15) In the Fifteenth Judicial District, twenty-eight thirty assistant district
attorneys;
(16) In the Sixteenth Judicial District, twenty-three twenty-four assistant
district attorneys;
(17) In the Seventeenth Judicial District, thirteen sixteen assistant district
attorneys;
(18) In the Eighteenth Judicial District, thirteen assistant district attorneys;
(19) In the Nineteenth Judicial District, fifty-five seventy-one assistant
district attorneys;
(20) In the Twentieth Judicial District, five assistant district attorneys;
(21) In the Twenty-First Judicial District, ninteen twenty assistant district
attorneys;
(22) In the Twenty-Second Judicial District, thirty forty-four assistant district
attorneys;
(23) In the Twenty-Third Judicial District, nineteen twenty assistant district
attorneys;
(24) In the Twenty-Fourth Judicial District, fifty-four fifty-eight assistant
district attorneys;
(25) In the Twenty-Fifth Judicial District, five six assistant district attorneys;
(26) In the Twenty-Sixth Judicial District, thirteen assistant district attorneys;
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 719 ENROLLED
(27) In the Twenty-Seventh Judicial District, twelve fifteen assistant district
attorneys;
(28) In the Twenty-Eighth Judicial District, three assistant district attorneys;
(29) In the Twenty-Ninth Judicial District, ten assistant district attorneys;
(30) In the Thirtieth Judicial District, six assistant district attorneys;
(31) In the Thirty-First Judicial District, four five assistant district attorneys;
(32) In the Thirty-Second Judicial District, twenty-one twenty-two assistant
district attorneys;
(33) In the Thirty-Third Judicial District, four five assistant district attorneys;
(34) In the Thirty-Fourth Judicial District, nine ten assistant district attorneys;
(35) In the Thirty-Fifth Judicial District, four five assistant district attorneys;
(36) In the Thirty-Sixth Judicial District, five six assistant district attorneys;
(37) In the Thirty-Seventh Judicial District, three assistant district attorneys;
(38) In the parish of Orleans, eighty-three seventy-three assistant district
attorneys;
(39) In the Thirty-Eighth Judicial District, two assistant district attorneys;
(40) In the Thirty-Ninth Judicial District, two assistant district attorneys;
(41) In the Fortieth Judicial District, nine ten assistant district attorneys;
(42) In the Forty-Second Judicial District, four five assistant district attorneys.
Section 2. The provisions of Section 1 shall become effective when an Act of the
Louisiana Legislature containing a specific appropriation of monies for the implementation
of the provisions of this Act becomes effective.
Section 3. In accordance with the provisions of R.S. 16:54, any additional changes
in the number of assistant district attorneys as provided by this Act which were not approved
by the Governor's Advisory and Review Commission on April 12, 2026, shall become
effective upon recommendation by the commission that such additional assistant district
attorneys satisfy the applicable guidelines in its report to the governor and the Louisiana
Legislature.
Section 4. The provisions of this Section and Section 2 shall become effective upon
signature by the governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 719 ENROLLED
bills to become law without signature by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section
18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved
by the legislature, the provisions of this Section shall become effective on the day following
such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.